Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
CHAPTER 3 Installment Loans

Cross references.

Payday loans are illegal, §

16-17-1

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 1/SB 462, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds and declares that installment lending vitally affects the general economy of Georgia and the public interest and welfare of its citizens; therefore, it is the policy of Georgia and the purpose of this chapter to protect the interest of borrowers and provide for sound, efficient, and responsive regulation of installment lenders.”

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 10/SB 462, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall apply to all installment loan agreements entered into on and after July 1, 2020.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of Comptroller General Industrial Loan Department, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Chapter 120-1-1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Small Loans Under Georgia Laws,” see 3 Mercer L. Rev. 227 (1952).

For article, “The Georgia Industrial Loan Act: An Analysis,” see 7 Mercer L. Rev. 297 (1956).

For article discussing the Industrial Loan Act with emphasis on defending the debtor from claims, see 24 Mercer L. Rev. 545 (1973).

For article surveying 1976 to 1977 developments in application of the Industrial Loan Act, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 41 (1977).

For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with commercial law from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (1978).

For article discussing methods of computation of finance charges in Georgia consumer credit contracts, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (1978).

For note discussing transfer fees in home loan assumptions in reference to the Georgia usury laws, see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 454 (1975).

For note discussing significant judicial, legislative, and administrative developments under the Industrial Loan Act between 1973 and 1978, see 27 Emory L.J. 109 (1978).

For note discussing debtor-creditor relations under the Georgia Industrial Loan Act, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

For note, “Gorsuch’s Purgatory:
Attempting to Define Debt Collector Under the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act,” see 35 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 433 (2019).

For comment on Lewis v. Termplan, Inc.,

124 Ga. App. 507

,

184 S.E.2d 473

(1971), see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 380 (1973).

For comment on Georgia Inv. Co. v. Norman,

231 Ga. 821

,

204 S.E.2d 740

(1974), see 26 Mercer L. Rev. 321 (1974).